Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1402.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1203.1. State Certificate Fee Reduction.--Certificate fees assessed by the Department of Education related to the review of certificate eligibility for issuance of certificates under section 1201 may not be more than fifty dollars ($50).SECTION 2. SECTION 1216.1(D) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:<--<--123456789101112131415161718 SECTION 1216.1. PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR DISCIPLINE FEE.--* * *(D) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW OR REGULATION, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES, INCLUDING A RESERVE COMPONENT OR NATIONAL GUARD, OR A VETERAN, OR THE SPOUSE OF THE MEMBER OF THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES OR THE SPOUSE OF THE VETERAN, [SHALL] MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY [ONLY THE FOLLOWING FEES] A FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT WITH RESPECT TO THE INDIVIDUAL'S CERTIFICATION[:(1) A CERTIFICATION FEE NOT TO EXCEED TEN DOLLARS ($10).(2) A PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR DISCIPLINE FEE NOT TO EXCEED TWENTY-FIVE DOLLARS ($25)].* * *Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1402PN1884 - 2 - <--12345678910111213